Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Death Investigations

Cross references.

Death certificates generally, §

31-10-15

et seq.

Criteria for determining death, §

31-10-16

.

45-16-20.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Death Investigation Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-21.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Autopsy” means the dissection of a dead body and the examination of bone, tissue, organs, and foreign objects for the purpose of determining the cause of death and circumstances surrounding the same, which procedure shall include as a minimum an external examination and the examination of the brain, neck and thoracic organs, and abdominal organs.

(1.1)

“Chief medical examiner” means the chief medical examiner appointed pursuant to Code Section 35-3-153.

“County medical examiner” means that office established in lieu of the office of coroner pursuant to Code Section 45-16-80 or any amendment to the Constitution continued pursuant to the authority of Article XI, Section I, Paragraph IV of the Constitution.

“Division” means the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.

“External examination” means an external examination of a dead body but shall not include dissection of the body for any purpose except dissection which is necessary for and limited to procurement of blood or body fluids for toxicological or other analysis.

“Forensic consultant” means a person meeting the requirements and authorized to perform the duties specified in subsection (c) of Code Section 45-16-23.

“Inquest” means an official judicial inquiry before a coroner and coroner’s jury for the purpose of determining the cause of death.

“Limited dissection” means the incision into or dissection of a dead body for diagnosis or evidence collection and the term includes without being limited to an external examination but does not include an individual examination of the:

Brain;

Neck organs;

Thoracic organs; and

Abdominal organs

but may include an examination of any but not all of the categories of organs specified in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this paragraph.

“Local medical examiner” means a person meeting the requirements and authorized to perform the duties specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-16-23.

“Medical examiner” means:

The chief medical examiner;

A regional medical examiner;

A county medical examiner;

A local medical examiner; or

Any person who is employed by the state and appointed as a medical examiner as of December 1, 1989, who continues to perform the duties and exercise the powers of a medical examiner under this article when such performance and exercise are within the scope of such employment.

“Medical examiner’s inquiry” means an inquiry made by a medical examiner into the circumstances surrounding a death which is required to be reported under the provisions of Code Section 45-16-24, which inquiry may include, but is not required to include, a scene investigation, an external examination, a limited dissection, an autopsy, or any combination thereof.

“Medical examiner’s investigator” means a person meeting the requirements and authorized to perform the duties specified in subsection (d) of Code Section 45-16-23.

“Peace officer in charge” means any peace officer of the Georgia State Patrol or agent of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, sheriff or sheriff’s deputy, peace officer assigned to the coroner’s office, county policeman, city policeman, or city detective who may be in charge of the investigation of any case involving a death covered by Code Sections 45-16-27 and 45-16-32.

“Regional medical examiner” means a medical examiner who is employed by the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and who is a pathologist appointed by the chief medical examiner pursuant to Code Section 35-3-153.

“Scene investigation” means an examination by the medical examiner or medical examiner’s investigator of the area surrounding a dead body or area where a death or agonal event occurred.

“Unattended death,” “died unattended,” or “died unattended by a physician” means a death where a person dies of apparently natural causes and has no physician who can certify the death as being due to natural causes. If the suspected cause of death directly involves any trauma or complication of such trauma, the death must be reported to the coroner or county medical examiner. An unattended death also occurs when a person is admitted in an unresponsive state to a hospital and dies within 24 hours of admission.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 2; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1631, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 45; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1436, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 45; Ga. L. 2003, p. 498, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Forensic Sciences Act of 1997.’ ”

45-16-22.
Medical examiners’ inquiries — Facilities, persons authorized to perform inquiries, payment of fees, jurisdiction, and clerical and secretarial assistance.

The director of the division is authorized and directed to cooperate with and assist the peace officers in charge, medical examiners, and coroners of the state in making the facilities of the division available for the performing of medical examiners’ inquiries on dead bodies as required by this article.

The county governing authority shall after consulting with the coroner, if any, be authorized to appoint one or more local medical examiners who shall be licensed physicians or pathologists. The chief medical examiner may, at the request of a county governing authority, authorize one or more licensed physicians or pathologists at convenient locations throughout the state to act as local medical examiners in performing medical examiners’ inquiries as required by this article. The chief medical examiner shall confer with local county officials in making appointments of regional and local medical examiners. Any regional or local medical examiner appointed by the chief medical examiner shall have such jurisdiction within this state as designated by the chief medical examiner.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, it shall be in the sole discretion of the medical examiner to determine whether or not an autopsy or limited dissection is required; provided, however, that the medical examiner shall give due consideration to the opinions of the coroner and the peace officer in charge regarding the requirements of accepted investigation techniques and the rules of evidence applicable thereto.

In the event that any local medical examiner or regional medical examiner is unable or unwilling to serve in any case, the coroner or the peace officer in charge may call upon the chief medical examiner, who shall perform a medical examiner’s inquiry or direct another medical examiner to perform such inquiry.

For each external examination so performed, in cases where limited dissection or autopsy of the body is not required, the medical examiner shall receive the fee set in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 35-3-151. The fee in each case is to be paid from funds of the county in which the act was committed; or, if the county in which the act was committed is unknown, the fee shall be paid from funds of the county in which the body was found. In the event the place in which the act was committed is not known but is later established, the county in which the act was committed shall be responsible for payment of fees incurred by the medical examiner. Subject to funds being appropriated or otherwise available for such purpose, the chief medical examiner shall provide transportation of the deceased person to the site of the autopsy, if such autopsy is to be performed by a state or regional medical examiner employed by the state, and to return the body to the county where the death occurred.

When death occurs in a hospital as a direct result and consequence of acts or events taking place in a county other than the one in which such death occurs, the body shall be returned to the county in which such acts or events took place. When a dead body is found in a county in which the acts or events leading to death did not occur, it shall be returned to the county in which the acts or events did occur, if known. The coroner or local medical examiner of the county in which such acts or events took place shall assume jurisdiction and the medical examiner’s inquiry, if any performed, shall be paid for from funds of the county in which such acts or events took place.

(f.1)

When death occurs in a hospital as a direct result and consequence of acts or events taking place in a county other than the one in which such death occurs, the hospital shall immediately notify the coroner or the county medical examiner of the county in which the acts or events resulting in the death occurred.

In the event that a medical examiner’s inquiry is performed by the chief medical examiner or an employee thereof, no fee therefor shall be imposed pursuant to this Code section. In the event that a medical examiner’s inquiry is performed by a medical examiner regularly employed at a fixed compensation by any county or group of counties, no fee shall be imposed upon any county or group of counties employing that medical examiner at a fixed compensation.

Any person holding office as a medical examiner pursuant to an appointment of the state medical examiner on May 1, 1997, shall continue in the exercise of his or her functions and duties until such person’s successor has been duly appointed.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 3; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 38, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 503, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1321, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 812, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 417, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 45; Ga. L. 2009, p. 81, § 1A/HB 64.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Forensic Sciences Act of 1997.’ ”

Subsection (h) as added by Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 45, is a codification of Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 11(a).

45-16-23.
Delegation of power by coroner or county medical examiner; qualifications of those authorized to perform examinations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any coroner or county medical examiner may delegate to a local medical examiner, forensic consultant, or medical examiner’s investigator the power to perform those duties of such coroner or medical examiner specified in this Code section if the person to whom such power is thus delegated meets the applicable requirements of this Code section for the performance of such duties, but the performance of those delegated duties shall not in any manner infringe upon or diminish the authority of the peace officer in charge at the scene of the crime.

A local medical examiner shall be a licensed physician appointed by the state medical examiner to perform scene investigations, external examinations, limited dissections, autopsies, or any combination of such duties.

A forensic consultant shall be an expert in a field of forensic science, including but not limited to odontology or anthropology, appointed and authorized by the state medical examiner to examine human remains and evidence under the medical examiner’s jurisdiction.

A medical examiner’s investigator shall be a person employed by a medical examiner to perform duties of such medical examiner with the same authority as the medical examiner while at the scene of death and during subsequent investigation, except that no medical examiner’s investigator is authorized to make any arrest or perform official external examinations, limited dissections, or autopsies.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 24; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-24.
Notification of suspicious or unusual deaths; court ordered medical examiner’s inquiry; written report of inquiry.

When any individual dies in any county in this state:

As a result of violence;

By suicide or casualty;

Suddenly when in apparent good health;

In any suspicious or unusual manner, with particular attention to those individuals 16 years of age and under;

After birth but before seven years of age if the death is unexpected or unexplained;

As a result of an execution carried out pursuant to the imposition of the death penalty under Article 2 of Chapter 10 of Title 17;

When an inmate of a state hospital or a state, county, or city penal institution;

After having been admitted to a hospital in an unconscious state and without regaining consciousness within 24 hours of admission;

As a result of an apparent drug overdose;

Who is a pregnant female or a female who was pregnant within 365 days prior to such female’s death; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to a female whose death resulted from an incidental or accidental cause, including a motor vehicle accident, or from any other event or condition where it is apparent that the death was not causally related to the care of or physiology of pregnancy or its maintenance; or

When unattended by a physician, it shall be the duty of any law enforcement officer or other person having knowledge of such death to notify immediately the coroner or county medical examiner of the county in which the acts or events resulting in the death occurred or the body is found. For purposes of paragraph (11) of this subsection, no individual shall be deemed to have died unattended by a physician when the death occurred while he or she was a patient of a hospice licensed under Article 9 of Chapter 7 of Title 31. For purposes of paragraph (11) of this subsection, an individual shall be deemed to have died unattended by a physician when any such individual had not been seen or treated by a physician within the 180 days prior to such individual’s death for a condition or illness likely to have caused or contributed to such individual’s death.

A coroner or county medical examiner who is notified of a death pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section under circumstances specified in paragraphs (1) through (9) of such subsection shall order a medical examiner’s inquiry of that death. A coroner or medical examiner who is notified of a death pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section under circumstances specified in paragraph (10) of such subsection and which death was not under circumstances specified in paragraphs (1) through (9) of such subsection shall order a medical examiner’s inquiry for such death through a regional perinatal center, as identified by the Department of Public Health. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a medical examiner’s inquiry of a death if a coroner or county medical examiner is notified of a death under circumstances specified in paragraph (11) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

Whenever an affidavit is made and filed with a court having criminal jurisdiction attesting that a person came to his or her death by foul play, that court may interrogate and examine witnesses, if any exist, as to the necessity of a medical examiner’s inquiry. Should the court decide that a medical examiner’s inquiry is essential to the ends of justice, such inquiry shall be ordered by that court.

A medical examiner’s inquiry required under this Code section shall be reduced to writing and filed as provided in Code Section 45-16-32. At the time of such filing, a copy of the medical examiner’s inquiry into a death reported to a coroner or county medical examiner pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall also be transmitted to the department of family and children services of the county in which the child resided at the time of death.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 812, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1073, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 391, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 81, § 1B/HB 64; Ga. L. 2017, p. 319, § 6-1/HB 249; Ga. L. 2018, p. 239, § 1/SB 327; Ga. L. 2022, p. 409, § 1/SB 496.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), substituted “individual” for “person” in the introductory paragraph and in the last sentence of the ending undesignated paragraph, substituted “individuals” for “persons” in paragraph (a)(5), deleted “or” at the end of paragraph (a)(8), added “; or” at the end of paragraph (a)(9), added paragraph (a)(10), and substituted “he or she” for “the person” near the end of the ending undesignated paragraph.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted former paragraph (a)(4), which read: “When unattended by a physician;”; redesignated former paragraphs (a)(5) through (a)(9) as present paragraphs (a)(4) through (a)(8), respectively; deleted “or” at the end of paragraph (a)(8); redesignated former paragraph (a)(10) as present paragraph (a)(9); added “; or” at the end of paragraph (a)(9); and added paragraph (a)(10); and, in subsection (b), inserted “under circumstances specified in paragraphs (1) through (9) of such subsection” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2022 amendment, effective July 1, 2022,

deleted “or” at the end of paragraph (a)(9); added paragraph (a)(10); redesignated former paragraph (a)(10) as present paragraph (a)(11); in the ending undesignated paragraph of subsection (a), in the second sentence, substituted “purposes of paragraph (11) of this subsection” for “the purposes of this Code section” and inserted “by a physician”, and added the last sentence; inserted the second sentence in subsection (b); and substituted “paragraph (5)” for “paragraph (6)” in the second sentence of subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 143 (2017).

45-16-25.
Coroner’s or county medical examiner’s duties after notice of suspicious or unusual death; embalmment; inventory and disposition of deceased’s property; use of deceased’s property for evidence; autopsy required.

Upon receipt of the notice required by Code Section 45-16-24, the coroner or county medical examiner shall immediately take charge of the body. If a registered professional nurse, nurse practitioner, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant authorized to make a pronouncement of death under Code Section 31-10-16 or a qualified physician is not available, a coroner, deputy coroner, or medical examiner’s investigator may make a pronouncement of death at the investigation scene if, and only if, one or more of the following conditions is met:

The body is in a state of rigor mortis with lividity present;

The body is in a state of decomposition evidenced by a component of putrefaction;

The body is skeletonized; or

Death has been established by qualified emergency medical services personnel.

It shall be the duty of a coroner notified as required by Code Section 45-16-24 to summon a medical examiner and proper peace officer. It shall be the duty of a county medical examiner so notified to summon a proper peace officer. When present at the scene of death, the peace officer shall have jurisdiction over the scene of death. The medical examiner or coroner and the peace officer shall together make inquiries regarding the cause, manner, and circumstances of death. If either the peace officer or medical examiner is not present at the scene of death, then whichever of the two officers is present shall have jurisdiction over the scene of death. If neither the peace officer nor the medical examiner is present at the scene of death in any county in which the office of coroner has not been replaced by a county medical examiner, the coroner shall assume the responsibility of such officers at the scene of death and shall have the body transported to a local medical examiner who shall conduct a medical examiner’s inquiry. The medical examiner, at any time, to facilitate examination, when he or she deems it necessary, may have the body embalmed or retain it for refrigeration for preservation or to avoid the threat of infectious disease prior to release of the body to the next of kin. Such expense of embalming shall be paid by the county of the coroner’s or medical examiner’s jurisdiction.

When positive identification of dead bodies has not been established conclusively through personal visual examination of the remains by persons well acquainted with the decedent in life or by comparison of fingerprints or footprints or by identification of unique physical characteristics, such as prosthetic appliances, or by comparison of skeletal X-rays, including previous fractures, or by amputations, the medical examiner must either chart or X-ray the decedent’s dentition or call upon a licensed dentist of the medical examiner’s choosing to carry out a dental examination of the body. This may be accomplished either by examination in situ or by removal of the jaws with teeth to the dentist’s office. The dentist shall chart the deceased’s dentition and make two copies, one of which shall be filed with the medical examiner’s inquiry report to the division and the other with the Georgia Crime Information Center of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation. The dentist may, at his or her discretion, make such X-rays of the mouth as he or she deems necessary. The dentist shall be paid a fee as determined in accordance with Code Section 35-3-151. These fees shall be paid by the county of the coroner’s or local medical examiner’s jurisdiction.

The coroner or county medical examiner shall, in the absence of the next of kin of the deceased person, take possession of all property of value found on such person, make an exact inventory thereof on his or her report, and surrender the same to the person entitled to its custody or possession. In no circumstance shall any property of value found on or belonging to the deceased be converted to the personal use of the coroner or county medical examiner. The coroner, medical examiner, or peace officer shall take possession of any objects, anatomical specimens, or articles which, in his or her opinion, may be helpful in establishing the cause of death, manner of death, or identification of the deceased; and in cooperation with a forensic laboratory he or she may make such tests and examinations of said objects, specimens, or articles as may be necessary or useful in determining the cause of death, manner of death, or the identity of the deceased. At his or her discretion, the medical examiner or coroner may dispose of such objects, specimens, or articles when the medical examiner’s or coroner’s need for their retention has ended, provided that any property of value shall be returned to the next of kin of the deceased when no longer needed in the investigation or for evidence in a prosecution. Any coroner who converts property of a deceased to his or her personal use shall be guilty of a violation of Code Section 16-8-4 and upon conviction shall be punished as provided in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 16-8-12. In the event that a criminal prosecution arises, all such objects and articles together with reports of any examinations made upon them shall be retained in the custody of the investigating agency or the forensic laboratory which conducted the examination until their production as evidence is required by the prosecuting officer or upon written order of the peace officer in charge or court having proper jurisdiction.

The Georgia Bureau of Investigation is authorized to perform a post mortem examination and autopsy on a person whose death occurs within a state owned or leased building or on the curtilage of such building. The Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall have jurisdiction relating to the investigation of such a death, and this authority and jurisdiction shall supersede any other authority or jurisdiction provided for by this article relating to a post mortem examination or autopsy.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 9; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1009, § 6; Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 829, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1968, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 364, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 6; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1585, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 610, § 1/SB 38; Ga. L. 2010, p. 574, § 1/HB 1095; Ga. L. 2014, p. 708, § 1/SB 383; Ga. L. 2017, p. 625, § 4/SB 96.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 24, 2014, in subsection (c), added the second sentence, added the proviso at the end of the fourth sentence, and added the fifth sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “, nurse practitioner, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant” near the beginning of the second sentence of paragraph (a)(1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, “16-8-4” was substituted for “16-18-4” and “16-8-12” was substituted for “16-18-12”, respectively, in subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Forensic Sciences Act of 1997.’ ”

45-16-25.1.
Releasing remains of deceased to next of kin; exception.

A dead body, other than skeletal remains, taken into custody under this article shall be released to the next of kin of the deceased, or to the agent of the next of kin, no later than 24 hours after the demand for release by that next of kin, or agent thereof, unless by that time the peace officer, medical examiner, or coroner has made a written finding that foul play may have been involved in the death of the deceased.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-25.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 728, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.

45-16-26.
Assumption of duties by medical examiner in absence of coroner or deputy coroner; signing of death certificates.

When there is no coroner or deputy coroner in a county in which the office of coroner has not been replaced by a county medical examiner or when both are absent from the county when needed or will not or cannot perform the duties required under this article, the medical examiner shall assume the duties and responsibilities of the coroner. When the medical examiner is performing the duties of the coroner in such cases, such medical examiner may sign the death certificate except when an inquest is held.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 573; Code 1868, § 637; Code 1873, § 596; Code 1882, § 596; Civil Code 1895, § 4074; Penal Code 1895, § 1268; Civil Code 1910, § 4671; Penal Code 1910, § 1350; Code 1933, § 21-204; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 602, § 22; Ga. L. 1984, p. 812, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 843, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 3.